District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1316

Interference with foreign diplomatic and consular offices, officers, and property — Penalties; exception.

Repealed.

History

1981 Ed., § 22-1116
May 7, 1988, D.C. Law 7-105, § 2, 35 DCR 728